New York, session 2025-2026, A1620.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 299-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 299-a. Liability of employees. When the division has found an 4 employer to be liable for an unlawful discriminatory practice or prac- 5 tices under this article, the employee responsible for committing such 6 unlawful discriminatory practice or practices shall be jointly and 7 severally liable with the employer for any damages awarded under this 8 article. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04162-01-5